Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.063

Compilation of jury source list, master jury list, and selection of jurors by electronic data processing.

The judge or judges of the superior court of any county may employ a properly programmed electronic data processing system or device to compile the jury source list, and to compile the master jury list and to randomly select jurors from the master jury list.

[ 1993 c 408 s 6; 1988 c 188 s 5; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 13 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1993 c 408: See notes following RCW 2.36.054.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.